Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 7

Transferable Interests and Rights of Transferees and Creditors

61-3-701. Nature of transferable interest.

A transferable interest is personal property.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-702. Transfer of transferable interest.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a transferable interest:

Is permissible;

Does not, by itself, cause a person's dissociation as a partner or a dissolution and winding up of the limited partnership's activities and affairs; and

Subject to § 61-3-704, does not entitle the transferee to:

Participate in the management or conduct of the limited partnership's activities and affairs; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c), have access to required information, records, or other information concerning the limited partnership's activities and affairs.

A transferee has the right to receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled.

In a dissolution and winding up of a limited partnership, a transferee is entitled to an account of the limited partnership's transactions only from the date of dissolution.

A transferable interest may be evidenced by a certificate of the interest issued by a limited partnership in a record, and, subject to this section, the interest represented by the certificate may be transferred by a transfer of the certificate.

A limited partnership need not give effect to a transferee's rights under this section until the partnership knows or has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of a transferable interest in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the partnership agreement is ineffective if the intended transferee has knowledge or notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

Except as otherwise provided in §§ 61-3-601(b)(4)(B) and 61-3-603(4)(B), if a general or limited partner transfers a transferable interest, the transferor retains the rights of a general or limited partner other than the transferable interest transferred and retains all the duties and obligations of a general or limited partner.

If a general or limited partner transfers a transferable interest to a person that becomes a general or limited partner with respect to the transferred interest, the transferee is liable for the transferor's obligations under §§ 61-3-502 and 61-3-505 known to the transferee when the transferee becomes a partner.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-703. Charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or transferee, a court may enter a charging order against the transferable interest of the judgment debtor for the unsatisfied amount of the judgment. A charging order constitutes a lien on a judgment debtor's transferable interest and requires the limited partnership to pay over to the person to which the charging order was issued any distribution that otherwise would be paid to the judgment debtor.

To the extent necessary to effectuate the collection of distributions pursuant to a charging order in effect under subsection (a), the court may:

Appoint a receiver of the distributions subject to the charging order, with the power to make all inquiries the judgment debtor might have made; and

Make all other orders necessary to give effect to the charging order.

The partner or transferee whose transferable interest is subject to a charging order under subsection (a) may extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment and filing a certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued the charging order.

This chapter does not deprive any partner or transferee of the benefit of any exemption law applicable to the transferable interest of the partner or transferee.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a person, other than the partnership itself, seeking in the capacity of a judgment creditor to enforce a judgment against a partner or transferee may satisfy the judgment from the judgment debtor's transferable interest.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.

61-3-704. Power of legal representative of deceased partner.

If a partner dies, the deceased partner's legal representative may exercise:

The rights of a transferee provided in § 61-3-702(c); and

For the purposes of settling the estate, the rights of a current limited partner under § 61-3-304.

Acts 2017, ch. 440, § 1.